vi: Kiểu dáng máy câu: BFS; Cổ điển; Hãm bằng đòn bẩy; Hình dáng thấp; Hình tròn; Khác
th: ลักษณะโครงสร้างรอก: BFS; แบบทั่วไป; เบรกก้านโยก; ทรงต่ำ; ทรงกลม; อื่นๆ
fr: Profil du moulinet: BFS; Conventionnel; Frein à levier; Profil bas; Rond; Autre
da: Hjulprofil: BFS; Konventionel; Lever drag; Lavprofil; Rund; Andet
pl: Profil kołowrotka: BFS; Konwencjonalny; Z hamulcem dźwigniowym; Niskoprofilowy; Okrągły; Inne
de: Rollenprofil: BFS; Klassisch; Schiebebremse; Low Profile; Rund; Sonstige
en: Reel profile: BFS; Conventional; Lever drag; Low profile; Round; Other
ko: 릴 프로필: BFS; 컨벤셔널; 레버 드래그; 로우 프로파일; 라운드; 기타
sv: Rullens profil: BFS; Konventionell; Spakbroms; Lågprofil; Rund; Övrigt
sk-SK: Profil navijaka: BFS; Konvenčný; Páková brzda; Nízkoprofilový; Okrúhly; Iné
bg-BG: Профил на макарата: BFS; Конвенционален; Лостов аванс; Нископрофилна; Кръгла; Други
hu: Horgászorsó profilja: BFS; Hagyományos; Karos fék; Alacsony profilú; Kerek; Egyéb
tr: Makara gövde profili: BFS; Geleneksel; Kollu kalama; Düşük profilli; Yuvarlak; Diğer
sl-SI: Profil ribiške role: BFS; Klasična; Z ročično zavoro; Nizek profil; Okrogla; Drugo
it: Profilo del mulinello: BFS; Convenzionale; Frizione a leva; A basso profilo; Rotondo; Altro
lt-LT: Ritės profilis: BFS; Standartinis; Svirtinis stabdys; Žemo profilio; Apvalus; Kitas
pt-PT: Perfil do carreto: BFS; Convencional; Travão de alavanca; Perfil baixo; Redondo; Outro
ro-RO: Profilul mulinetei: BFS; Convențional; Frână cu levier; Profil redus; Rotund; Altele
fi: Kelan profiili: BFS; Perinteinen; Vipujarru; Matala profiili; Pyöreä; Muu
ru: Профиль катушки: BFS; Классическая; Тормоз-рычаг; Низкопрофильная; Круглая; Другое
zh-CN: 水滴轮外形结构: BFS; 传统型; 推杆泄力; 低剖面型; 圆形; 其他
el: Προφίλ καρουλιού: BFS; Συμβατικό; Lever drag; Χαμηλό προφίλ; Στρογγυλό; Άλλο
cs: Profil navijáku: BFS; Klasický; Páková brzda; Nízkoprofilový; Kulatý; Ostatní
nl: Reel profiel: BFS; Conventioneel; Lever drag; Low profile; Rond; Overig
ja: リールプロファイル: BFS; コンベンショナル; レバードラグ; ロープロファイル; ラウンド; その他
es: Perfil del carrete: BFS; Convencional; Freno de palanca; Perfil bajo; Redondo; Otro
zh-TW: 捲線器輪廓: BFS; 鼓式; 推桿煞車; 水滴輪; 圓形; 其他
nb: Snelleprofil: BFS; Tradisjonell; Spakbrems; Lavprofil; Rund; Annet
pt-BR: Carretilha perfil: BFS; Convencional; Fricção por alavanca; Perfil baixo; Redondo; Outro
hr-HR: Profil koluta: BFS; Konvencionalno; Polužna kočnica; Niski profil; Okruglo; Ostalo